District of Columbia statutes.
16-2104

Death after action brought; legal representatives.

When one of several defendants in an action dies after the commencement of the action, his legal representatives may be made parties to the action as directed by Chapter 1 of Title 12.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 585, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2104.
1973 Ed., § 16-2104.